Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-187.03
Registered dairy heifer development facility, defined.

Registered dairy heifer development facility means a dairy heifer development facility that is registered under section 54-1,132.

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 7.
July 18, 2026